Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.50.4894

Part-time academic employees—Continuous health care eligibility—Employer contributions.

Health care benefits for part-time academic employees are governed by *RCW 41.05.053.

[ 2006 c 308 s 3.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: RCW 41.05.053 was repealed by 2009 c 537 s 8, effective January 1, 2010.